test/src/morphology/V-kittw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - kittõ: # Verb 32 'eng /est kittida/fin' - full paradigm
     kittõ+V+Inf: kittõ
     kittõ+V+Ger: kittõs
     kittõ+V+Sup: kittõm
     kittõ+V+Sup+Ine: kittõmõs
     kittõ+V+Sup+Ela: kittõmõst
     kittõ+V+Sup+Tra: kittõmõks
     kittõ+V+Sup+Abe: kittõmõt
     kittõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kitūb
     kittõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kittõt
     kittõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kitūbõd
     kittõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kitīz
     kittõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [kitīzt, kitīztõ]
     kittõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [kitīzt, kitīztõ]
     kittõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: kit
     kittõ+V+Cond+Sg3: kittõks
     kittõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kit
     kittõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: kit
     kittõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kittõgid
     kittõ+V+Jus+Sg3: kittõg
     kittõ+V+Quo+Sg3: kittiji
     kittõ+V+ActPrfPrc: kittõn
     kittõ+V+PssPrfPrc: kittõd
